Utah, session 2026, HB67.
Section 1. Section 63I-1-219 is amended to read:63I-1-219. Repeal dates: Title 19.(1)Title 19, Chapter 2, Air Conservation Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Section 19-2-109.6, Plantwide applicability limitation -- Publication of guidance required -- Report to committee -- Rulemaking, is repealed July 1, 2026.(3)Section 19-2-109.7, Permit by rule registration expansion study, is repealed July 1, 2026.(4)Title 19, Chapter 4, Safe Drinking Water Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(5)Section 19-4-115, Drinking water quality in schools and child care centers, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Title 19, Chapter 5, Water Quality Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 1, Solid and Hazardous Waste Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(8)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 3, Hazardous Substances Mitigation Act, is repealed July 1, 2030.(9)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 4, Petroleum Storage Tank Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(10)Section 19-6-510, Study of glass recycling, is repealed July 1, 2026.(11)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 6, Lead Acid Battery Disposal, is repealed July 1, 2026.(12)(11)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 7, Used Oil Management Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(13)(12)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 8, Waste Tire Recycling Act, is repealed July 1, 2030.(14)(13)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 10, Mercury Switch Removal Act, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.